Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1251
State Treasurer; interest, premium, income, and principal; collect.

The State Treasurer shall collect the interest, premium or other income on and the principal of such securities in his custody as the same become due and payable.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 15, p. 2355.